Nebraska, session 109, LB968.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB968 LB968
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $4,000,000 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 to the Military Department, for Program No. 545,
Emergency Management, for a grant for equipment for emergency rescue
events. To be eligible for a grant, the political subdivision shall show
to the Military Department that it is capable of assisting in statewide
rescue events. The grant shall be used exclusively to purchase equipment,
including, but not limited to, equipment that assists in emergency rescue
events such as water rescue events, equipment that aides in searching a
wide area such as tornado and flood situations, equipment used in
structural collapses, and equipment for hazardous materials situations.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-